Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2118
Injunctions authorized.

Whenever in the judgment of the commission any person has engaged or is about to engage in any acts or practices which constitute or will constitute a violation of the Membership Campground Act, the Attorney General may maintain an action in the name of the State of Nebraska in the district court of the county in which such violation or threatened violation occurred or in the district court of Lancaster County to abate and temporarily and permanently enjoin such acts and practices and to enforce compliance with the Membership Campground Act. The Attorney General shall not be required to give any bond nor shall any court costs be adjudged against the state.

Laws 1990, LB 656, § 18.